Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2399.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 414(d) and 419(1) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended to read:Section 414. Assistance Recipient Identification Program.--* * *(d) A person currently receiving or applying for assistance shall participate in the program. The person shall be identified using available technological means that shall include placing a photograph upon each electronic benefit transfer card and any other benefit card and that may include, but are not limited to, two-digit fingerimaging.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 419. Administration of Assistance and Related Functions.--Each county board shall:(1) Administer public assistance in the county, and determine the eligibility for assistance of applicants and continued eligibility for assistance of persons receiving the same in accordance with law and rules, regulations and standards established by the department. This paragraph includes requiring photographic identification under section 414(d) before providing any assistance.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2399PN3219 - 2 - 1234567891011